District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-1102.14

Delegation of Council authority to issue bonds.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 214, 43 DCR 4962
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(a), 48 DCR 4047

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-262.14.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 44-1101.01.
For temporary delay of the effective date of §§ 214-217 of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Emergency Act of 1996, see § 501(b) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-388, August 28, 1996, 43 DCR 4937), § 501(b) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-421, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6093), and § 501(b) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-487, January 2, 1997, 44 DCR 634).
For temporary delay of the effective date of §§ 214-217 of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997, see § 601(b) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-39, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2044).

Effective Dates

Section 501(b) of D.C. Law 11-212 provided that §§ 214 through 217 of the act shall take effect upon the enactment by Congress of the legislation proposed in title III of the act or of substantially similar legislation.

Editor's Notes

Council authority to delegate broadened: Section 11508 of Pub. L. 105-33, 111 Stat. 773, gave Council broad authority to delegate its power to issue revenue bonds.